Oklahoma, session 2025, SB794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-187E of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability
shall establish student teaching requirements for teacher candidates
who are enrolled in an educator preparation program accredited by
the Commission. The requirements shall include:
1. Completion of a minimum number of weeks of field experience;
or
2. Completion of a qualified job-embedded, competency-based
teacher registered apprenticeship program. For the purposes of this
section, “teacher registered apprenticeship program” means a
structured program that combines on-the-job training with academic
instruction to prepare individuals to become teachers.

B. The Commission shall promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 794 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 794 Page 3